Illinois, session 104th, HB1350.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 4-2001 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/4-2001)  (from Ch. 34, par. 4-2001)7    Sec. 4-2001. State's attorney salaries. 8    (a) There shall be allowed to the several state's 9attorneys in this State, except the state's attorney of Cook 10County, the following annual salary: 11        (1) Subject to paragraphs paragraph (5) and (6), to 12    each state's attorney in counties containing less than 13    10,000 inhabitants, $40,500 until December 31, 1988, 14    $45,500 until June 30, 1994, and $55,500 thereafter or as 15    set by the Compensation Review Board, whichever is 16    greater. 17        (2) Subject to paragraphs paragraph (5) and (6), to 18    each state's attorney in counties containing 10,000 or 19    more inhabitants but less than 20,000 inhabitants, $46,500 20    until December 31, 1988, $61,500 until June 30, 1994, and 21    $71,500 thereafter or as set by the Compensation Review 22    Board, whichever is greater. 23        (3) Subject to paragraphs paragraph (5) and (6), to   HB1350- 2 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1    each state's attorney in counties containing 20,000 or 2    more but less than 30,000 inhabitants, $51,000 until 3    December 31, 1988, $65,000 until June 30, 1994, and 4    $75,000 thereafter or as set by the Compensation Review 5    Board, whichever is greater. 6        (4) To each state's attorney in counties of 30,000 or 7    more inhabitants, $65,500 until December 31, 1988, $80,000 8    until June 30, 1994, and $96,837 thereafter or as set by 9    the Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater. 10        (5) Effective December 1, 2000 and until November 30, 11    2025, to each state's attorney in counties containing 12    fewer than 30,000 inhabitants, the same salary plus any 13    cost of living adjustments as authorized by the 14    Compensation Review Board to take effect after January 1, 15    1999, for state's attorneys in counties containing 20,000 16    or more but fewer than 30,000 inhabitants, or as set by the 17    Compensation Review Board whichever is greater.18        (6) Effective December 1, 2025, to each state's 19    attorney in counties containing fewer than 30,000 20    inhabitants, the same salary plus any cost of living 21    adjustments as authorized by the Compensation Review Board 22    to take effect on or after January 1, 2024, for state's 23    attorneys in counties containing 30,000 or more 24    inhabitants, or as set by the Compensation Review Board 25    whichever is greater.26    The State shall furnish 66 2/3% of the total annual   HB1350- 3 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1compensation to be paid to each state's attorney in Illinois 2based on the salary in effect on December 31, 1988, and 100% of 3the increases in salary taking effect after December 31, 1988.4    Subject to appropriation, said amounts furnished by the 5State shall be payable monthly by the Department of Revenue 6out of the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund or the 7General Revenue Fund to the county in which each state's 8attorney is elected.9    Each county shall be required to furnish 33 1/3% of the 10total annual compensation to be paid to each state's attorney 11in Illinois based on the salary in effect on December 31, 1988.12     Within 90 days after the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, the county board 14of any county with a population between 15,000 and 50,000 by 15resolution or ordinance may increase the amount of 16compensation to be paid to each eligible state's attorney in 17their county in the form of a longevity stipend which shall be 18added to and become part of the salary of the state's attorney 19for that year. To be eligible, the state's attorney must have 20served in the elected position for at least 20 continuous 21years and elect to participate in a program for an alternative 22annuity for county officers and make the required additional 23optional contributions as authorized by P.A. 90-32. 24    (b) Effective December 1, 2000, no state's attorney may 25engage in the private practice of law. However, until November 2630, 2000, (i) the state's attorneys in counties containing   HB1350- 4 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1fewer than 10,000 inhabitants may engage in the practice of 2law, and (ii) in any county between 10,000 and 30,000 3inhabitants or in any county containing 30,000 or more 4inhabitants which reached that population between 1970 and 5December 31, 1981, the state's attorney may declare his or her 6intention to engage in the private practice of law, and may do 7so through no later than November 30, 2000, by filing a written 8declaration of intent to engage in the private practice of law 9with the county clerk. The declaration of intention shall be 10irrevocable during the remainder of the term of office. The 11declaration shall be filed with the county clerk within 30 12days of certification of election or appointment, or within 60 13days of March 15, 1989, whichever is later. In that event the 14annual salary of such state's attorney shall be as follows: 15        (1) In counties containing 10,000 or more inhabitants 16    but less than 20,000 inhabitants, $46,500 until December 17    31, 1988, $51,500 until June 30, 1994, and $61,500 18    thereafter or as set by the Compensation Review Board, 19    whichever is greater. The State shall furnish 100% of the 20    increases taking effect after December 31, 1988. 21        (2) In counties containing 20,000 or more inhabitants 22    but less than 30,000 inhabitants, and in counties 23    containing 30,000 or more inhabitants which reached said 24    population between 1970 and December 31, 1981, $51,500 25    until December 31, 1988, $56,000 until June 30, 1994, and 26    $65,000 thereafter or as set by the Compensation Review   HB1350- 5 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1    Board, whichever is greater. The State shall furnish 100% 2    of the increases taking effect after December 31, 1988.3    (c) In counties where a state mental health institution, 4as hereinafter defined, is located, one assistant state's 5attorney shall, subject to appropriation, receive for his 6services, payable monthly by the Department of Revenue out of 7the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund or the General 8Revenue Fund to the county in which he is appointed, the 9following: 10        (1) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 11    containing less than 10,000 inhabitants, the sum of $2,500 12    per annum; 13        (2) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 14    containing not less than 10,000 inhabitants and not more 15    than 20,000 inhabitants, the sum of $3,500 per annum; 16        (3) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 17    containing not less than 20,000 inhabitants and not more 18    than 30,000 inhabitants, the sum of $4,000 per annum; 19        (4) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 20    containing not less than 30,000 inhabitants and not more 21    than 40,000 inhabitants, the sum of $4,500 per annum; 22        (5) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 23    containing not less than 40,000 inhabitants and not more 24    than 70,000 inhabitants, the sum of $5,000 per annum; 25        (6) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 26    containing not less than 70,000 inhabitants and not more   HB1350- 6 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1    than 1,000,000 inhabitants, the sum of $6,000 per annum.2    (d) The population of all counties for the purpose of 3fixing salaries as herein provided shall be based upon the 4last Federal census immediately previous to the appointment of 5an assistant state's attorney in each county.6    (e) At the request of the county governing authority, in 7counties where one or more state correctional institutions, as 8hereinafter defined, are located, one or more assistant 9state's attorneys shall, subject to appropriation, receive for 10their services, provided that such services are performed in 11connection with the state correctional institution, payable 12monthly by the Department of Revenue out of the Personal 13Property Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund to 14the county in which they are appointed, the following: 15        (1) $22,000 for each assistant state's attorney in 16    counties with one or more State correctional institutions 17    with a total average daily inmate population in excess of 18    2,000, on the basis of 2 assistant state's attorneys when 19    the total average daily inmate population exceeds 2,000 20    but is less than 4,000; and 3 assistant state's attorneys 21    when such population exceeds 4,000; with reimbursement to 22    be based on actual services rendered. 23        (2) $15,000 per year for one assistant state's 24    attorney in counties having one or more correctional 25    institutions with a total average daily inmate population 26    of between 750 and 2,000 inmates, with reimbursement to be   HB1350- 7 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1    based on actual services rendered. 2        (3) A maximum of $12,000 per year for one assistant 3    state's attorney in counties having less than 750 inmates, 4    with reimbursement to be based on actual services 5    rendered. 6        Upon application of the county governing authority and 7    certification of the State's Attorney, the Director of 8    Corrections may, in his discretion and subject to 9    appropriation, increase the amount of salary reimbursement 10    to a county in the event special circumstances require the 11    county to incur extraordinary salary expenditures as a 12    result of services performed in connection with State 13    correctional institutions in that county.14    In determining whether or not to increase the amount of 15salary reimbursement, the Director shall consider, among other 16matters: 17        (1) the nature of the services rendered; 18        (2) the results or dispositions obtained; 19        (3) whether or not the county was required to employ 20    additional attorney personnel as a direct result of the 21    services actually rendered in connection with a particular 22    service to a State correctional institution.23    (f) In counties where a State senior institution of higher 24education is located, the assistant state's attorneys 25specified by this Section shall, subject to appropriation, 26receive for their services, payable monthly by the Department   HB1350- 8 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1of Revenue out of the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund 2or the General Revenue Fund to the county in which appointed, 3the following: 4        (1) $14,000 per year each for employment on a full 5    time basis for 2 assistant state's attorneys in counties 6    having a State university or State universities with 7    combined full time enrollment of more than 15,000 8    students. 9        (2) $7,200 per year for one assistant state's attorney 10    with no limitation on other practice in counties having a 11    State university or State universities with combined full 12    time enrollment of 10,000 to 15,000 students. 13        (3) $4,000 per year for one assistant state's attorney 14    with no limitation on other practice in counties having a 15    State university or State universities with combined full 16    time enrollment of less than 10,000 students.17    Such salaries shall be paid to the state's attorney and 18the assistant state's attorney in equal monthly installments 19by such county out of the county treasury provided that, 20subject to appropriation, the Department of Revenue shall 21reimburse each county monthly, out of the Personal Property 22Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund, the amount 23of such salary. This Section shall not prevent the payment of 24such additional compensation to the state's attorney or 25assistant state's attorney of any county, out of the treasury 26of that county as may be provided by law.  HB1350- 9 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1    (g) For purposes of this Section, "State mental health 2institution" means any institution under the jurisdiction of 3the Department of Human Services that is listed in Section 4 of 4the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 5Administrative Act.6    For purposes of this Section, "State correctional 7institution" means any facility of the Department of 8Corrections including adult facilities, juvenile facilities, 9pre-release centers, community correction centers, and work 10camps.11    For purposes of this Section, "State university" means the 12University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Chicago 13State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 14University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 15University, Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois 16University, and any public community college which has 17established a program of interinstitutional cooperation with 18one of the foregoing institutions whereby a student, after 19earning an associate degree from the community college, 20pursues a course of study at the community college campus 21leading to a baccalaureate degree from the foregoing 22institution (also known as a "2 Plus 2" degree program).23    (h) A number of assistant state's attorneys shall be 24appointed in each county that chooses to participate, as 25provided in this subsection, for the prosecution of 26alcohol-related traffic offenses. Each county shall receive   HB1350- 10 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1monthly a subsidy for payment of the salaries and benefits of 2these assistant state's attorneys from State funds 3appropriated to the Department of Revenue out of the Personal 4Property Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund for 5that purpose. The amounts of subsidies provided by this 6subsection shall be adjusted for inflation each July 1 using 7the Consumer Price Index of the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 8the U.S. Department of Labor.9    When a county chooses to participate in the subsidy 10program described in this subsection (h), the number of 11assistant state's attorneys who are prosecuting 12alcohol-related traffic offenses must increase according to 13the subsidy provided in this subsection. These appointed 14assistant state's attorneys shall be in addition to any other 15assistant state's attorneys assigned to those cases on the 16effective date of this amendatory Act of the 91st General 17Assembly, and may not replace those assistant state's 18attorneys. In counties where the state's attorney is the sole 19prosecutor, this subsidy shall be used to provide an assistant 20state's attorney to prosecute alcohol-related traffic offenses 21along with the state's attorney. In counties where the state's 22attorney is the sole prosecutor, and in counties where a judge 23presides over cases involving a variety of misdemeanors, 24including alcohol-related traffic matters, assistant state's 25attorneys appointed and subsidized by this subsection (h) may 26also prosecute the different misdemeanor cases at the   HB1350- 11 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1direction of the state's attorney.2    Assistant state's attorneys shall be appointed under this 3subsection in the following number and counties shall receive 4the following annual subsidies: 5        (1) In counties with fewer than 30,000 inhabitants, 6    one at $35,000. 7        (2) In counties with 30,000 or more but fewer than 8    100,000 inhabitants, one at $45,000. 9        (3) In counties with 100,000 or more but fewer than 10    300,000 inhabitants, 2 at $45,000 each. 11        (4) In counties, other than Cook County, with 300,000 12    or more inhabitants, 4 at $50,000 each.13    The amounts appropriated under this Section must be 14segregated by population classification and disbursed monthly.15    If in any year the amount appropriated for the purposes of 16this subsection (h) is insufficient to pay all of the 17subsidies specified in this subsection, the amount 18appropriated shall first be prorated by the population 19classifications of this subsection (h) and then among the 20counties choosing to participate within each of those 21classifications. If any of the appropriated moneys for each 22population classification remain at the end of a fiscal year, 23the remainder of the moneys may be allocated to participating 24counties that were not fully funded during the course of the 25year. Nothing in this subsection prohibits 2 or more State's 26attorneys from combining their subsidies to appoint a joint   HB1350- 12 -LRB104 03519 RTM 13542 b1assistant State's attorney to prosecute alcohol-related 2traffic offenses in multiple counties. Nothing in this 3subsection prohibits a State's attorney from appointing an 4assistant State's attorney by contract or otherwise.5(Source: P.A. 96-259, eff. 8-11-09; 97-72, eff. 7-1-11.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.